Maryland, session 2026, HB0112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
8–209.
(e) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Agrivoltaics” has the meaning stated in § 7–237 of this article.
(iii) “Community solar energy generating system” has the meaning
stated in § 7–306.2 of the Public Utilities Article.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0112*

HOUSE BILL 112
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the Department
shall establish in regulations criteria to determine if land that appears to be actively used
for farm or agricultural purposes:
(i) is actually used for farm or agricultural purposes; and
(ii) qualifies for assessment under this section.
(3) The criteria shall include:
(i) the zoning of the land;
(ii) the present and past use of the land including land under the Soil
Bank Program of the United States;
(iii) the productivity of the land, including timberlands and
reforested lands; and
(iv) the gross income that is derived from the agricultural activity.
(4) (i) This paragraph applies through the life cycle of a community
solar energy generating system that:
1. is placed in service after June 30, 2022; and
2. has been approved on or before December 31, [2025] 2030,
as a community solar energy generating system by the Public Service Commission under §
7–306.2 of the Public Utilities Article.
(ii) The Department shall assess and qualify land that is used by a
community solar energy generating system for agrivoltaics as land that is actively used for
farm or agricultural purposes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.